Washington statutes.
RCW 15.150.020

Interagency coordination team for cannabis laboratory quality standards.

(1) The interagency coordination team for cannabis laboratory quality standards is created. The team consists of the department, the liquor and cannabis board, and the department of health. The department is designated lead agency for the team and must provide the team with all necessary administrative support.

(2) The agencies that make up the team must each dedicate administrative, policy, scientific, or other staff necessary to successfully accomplish the duties assigned to the team.

(3) The team must:

(a) Coordinate among all participating agencies on agency policies, actions, and regulatory activities that relate to cannabis testing laboratory quality standards; and

(b) Advise the department on implementation and maintenance of cannabis testing laboratory quality standards topics including, but not limited to, analytical methods, validation protocols, quality assurance and quality control practices, project planning and sampling guides, and other topics as necessary to fulfill the purposes of the team and chapter 135, Laws of 2022. In making its recommendations, the team must take into account the cannabis science task force recommendations.

[ 2022 c 135 s 3.]

NOTES:

Purpose—2022 c 135: See note following RCW 15.150.010.